Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska37-517
Game animals and game birds; use of aircraft, vessel, or vehicle to spot; radio; prohibited.

It shall be unlawful for any person one day before or during the open season to spot, locate, or place under surveillance any game animal or game bird with the aid of any aircraft, vessel, vehicle, snowmobile, or conveyance of any type and convey information about such animal's or bird's location to any person or group of persons by radio or other electronic device.

Laws 1978, LB 828, § 2;

R.S.1943, (1993), § 37-529;

Laws 1998, LB 922, § 237.